Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6608
Act, how construed.

The Insurance Fraud Act does not:

(1) Preempt the authority or relieve the duty of any other law enforcement agency to investigate, examine, and prosecute suspected violations of law;

(2) Prevent or prohibit a person from voluntarily disclosing any information concerning insurance fraud to any law enforcement agency;

(3) Limit any of the powers granted elsewhere by the laws of this state to the Director of Insurance or the Department of Insurance to investigate and examine possible violations of law and to take appropriate action; or

(4) Limit any of the powers granted elsewhere by the laws of this state to the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court to investigate and examine possible violations of law and to take appropriate action.

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 8.